Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.006

Commission—Panel membership—Quorum.

The commission may appoint members of panels of at least three members. A quorum for transaction of any business by a panel is a minimum of three members. A majority vote of a quorum of the panel is required to transact business delegated to it by the commission including, but not limited to, licensing, disciplinary, and adjudicative actions.

[ 2022 c 240 s 17.]